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LANDCRUISER(W/G) (RM6 16E)

DTC C1763 /63,C 1764 /64 FluidPressureAbnormality
(Valve Does Not Open)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1763 /63

When thepump&motor isONand thepumpdeliverypressure
h d d 15 8 MP (161 k f /

2
2290 i) ti l

SControl valveassembly
SControl valveassemblycircuit
SFluidpressuresensor

SFluidclog in the fluid lineoreachsolenoidvalve

C1764 /64

hasexceeded 15.8MPa( 161 kgf/cm
2

,2,290psi) continuously
for 0.3 sec. SHeightcontrolaccumulator

SHeightcontrolaccumulatorcircuit
SFluidpressuresensor
SFluidclog in the fluid lineoreachsolenoidvalve

Fail safe function:
S If theDTCC 1763 /63detected, theheightcontrol isprohibitedafter the followingcontrolshave

been performed.
z Incase that theheightof thedefectwheel is −10 m m (−0.4 in.) to+ 10mm(0.4 in.)against
the other wheels, adjust the normal wheels to the standard height.
z Incase that theheightof thedefectwheel ismore than 10mm(0.4 in.)higher than theother
wheels,adjust thenormalwheels 10mm(0.4 in.)higher.
z Incase that theheightof thedefectwheel is less than 10mm(0.4 in.) lower than theother
wheels,adjust thenormalwheels 10mm(0.4 in.) lower.

S If theDTCC 1764 /64detected, theECUprohibits thecontrolofaccumulatingandreleasingof
the pressure of the height control accumulator.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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LANDCRUISER(W/G) (RM6 16E)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkcontrolvalvesolenoidandaccumulatorsolenoid.

CONTROL VALVE SOLENOID
PREPARATION:
Disconnect the control valve assembly connector.
CHECK:
Checkcontinuitybetween terminals2and 1,3,4,5of thecon-
trol valveassemblyconnector.
OK:

Continuity

ACCUMULATOR SOLENOID
PREPARATION:
Disconnect the accumulator solenoid connector from the height
control accumulator.
CHECK:
Checkcontinuitybetween terminals 1 and2of theaccumulator
solenoid connector.
OK:

Continuity

NG Replace control valve assembly or accumulator
solenoid.

OK

2 Check fluid pressure sensor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the fluid pressure sensor connector.
CHECK:
(a)Connect3drybatteriesof 1.5V inseries.
(b) Connect terminal 3 to the batteries’ positive (+) terminal,

and terminal 1 to thebatteries’negative ( −) terminal, then
applyvoltageabout4.5Vbetween terminals 1 and3.

(c)Measurevoltagebetween terminals 1 and2.
OK:

Voltage: Approx. 4.5 V

NG Replace fluid pressure sensor.

OK
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3 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between control
valve assembly, height control accumulator and suspension control ECU (See
page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Clear the DTC (See page DI−208).


